Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1690.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 401(d) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 401. Qualifications Required to Secure Compensation.--Compensation shall be payable to any employe who 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 is or becomes unemployed, and who--* * *(d) * * *(3) A claimant shall report the receipt of any of the following benefits to the department along with any other information requested by the department necessary to make a determination of eligibility under this subsection:(i) Indemnity benefits for total or partial disability under the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act.(ii) Benefits paid to the claimant for disability under 42 U.S.C. § 423 (relating to disability insurance benefit payments).(iii) Benefits from a private insurance plan paid as the result of the claimant's temporary or permanent disability or other circumstances that cause the claimant to be unavailable for suitable work.(iv) Unpaid leave provided by an employer under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 28 (relating to family and medical leave).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB1690PN2075 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021